Maryland, session 2026, HB1427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1427*

HOUSE BILL 1427
9–102.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(9) “Renter” means an individual, who during the calendar year for which
the property tax relief under this section is sought, actually occupies a dwelling in which
the individual has a leasehold interest and who:
(i) is at least 60 years old;
(ii) has been found permanently and totally disabled and has
qualified for benefits under:
1. the Social Security Act;
2. the Railroad Retirement Act;
3. any federal act for service members; or
4. any federal retirement system;
(iii) has been found permanently and totally disabled by a county
health officer or the Baltimore City Commissioner of Health; or
(iv) is under the age of 60 years and:
1. has gross income below 200% OF the poverty threshold
that is established by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census in August
of the previous calendar year;
2. has 1 or more dependent children under 18 years old living
with the renter; and
3. does not receive federal or State housing subsidies or
reside in public housing.
(b) There is a property tax relief program for any renter.
(h) (1) The property tax relief that a renter may receive under this section is
the assumed property tax on real property less a percentage of the combined income of the
renter.
(2) The percentage is:
(I) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027:

HOUSE BILL 1427 3
[(i)] 1. 0% of the 1st [$4,000] $8,000 of combined income;
[(ii)] 2. 2.5% of the 2nd [$4,000] $8,000 of combined income; and
[(iii)] 3. 5.5% of the combined income over [$8,000] $16,000;
(II) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028:
1. 0% OF THE 1ST $12,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
2. 2.5% OF THE 2ND $12,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
AND
3. 5.5% OF THE COMBINED INCOME OVER $24,000; AND
(III) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029, AND
EACH TAXABLE YEAR THEREAFTER:
1. 0% OF THE 1ST $16,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
2. 2.5% OF THE 2ND $16,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
AND
3. 5.5% OF THE COMBINED INCOME OVER $32,000.
(i) The property tax relief under this section may not be:
(1) more than [$1,000]:
(I) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, $1,200;
(II) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, $1,500;
AND
(III) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029, AND
EACH TAXABLE YEAR THEREAFTER, $2,000;
(2) granted to any renter whose combined net worth exceeds $200,000 as
of December 31 of the calendar year for which the property tax relief is sought;
(3) granted to any renter whose dwelling is exempt from property tax; and
(4) granted if the credit under this section is less than $1 in any year.

HOUSE BILL 1427
9–104.
(b) (1) The homeowners’ tax credit under this section is a State–funded
program.
(g) (1) Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the property tax
credit under this section is the total real property tax of a dwelling, less the percentage of
the combined income of the homeowner that is described in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) The percentage is:
(I) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027:
[(i)] 1. 0% of the 1st [$8,000] $10,000 of combined income;
[(ii)] 2. 4% of the next [$4,000] $6,000 of combined income;
[(iii)] 3. 6.5% of the next [$4,000] $6,000 of combined income; and
[(iv)] 4. 9% of the combined income over [$16,000] $22,000;
(II) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028:
1. 0% OF THE 1ST $12,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
2. 4% OF THE 2ND $10,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
3. 6.5% OF THE NEXT $10,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
AND
4. 9% OF THE COMBINED INCOME OVER $32,000;
(III) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029:
1. 0% OF THE 1ST $12,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
2. 4% OF THE 2ND $14,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
3. 6.5% OF THE NEXT $14,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
AND
4. 9% OF THE COMBINED INCOME OVER $40,000; AND

HOUSE BILL 1427 5
(IV) FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2030, AND
EACH TAXABLE YEAR THEREAFTER:
1. 0% OF THE 1ST $12,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
2. 4% OF THE 2ND $18,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
3. 6.5% OF THE NEXT $20,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
AND
4. 9% OF THE COMBINED INCOME OVER $50,000.
(j) (1) A property tax credit under this section may not be granted to a
homeowner whose combined net worth exceeds $200,000 as of December 31 of the calendar
year that precedes the year in which the homeowner applies for the property tax credit or
whose combined gross income exceeds [$60,000 in that same calendar year] THE
FOLLOWING AMOUNTS:
(I) FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR ENDING DECEMBER 31, 2026,
$65,000;
(II) FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR ENDING DECEMBER 31, 2027,
$72,000;
(III) FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR ENDING DECEMBER 31, 2028,
$80,000; AND
(IV) FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR ENDING DECEMBER 31, 2029,
AND EACH CALENDAR YEAR THEREAFTER, $88,000.
(2) If a property tax credit under this section is less than $1 in any taxable
year, the credit may not be granted.
(3) A homeowner may claim a property tax credit under this section for
only 1 dwelling.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (u) of this section, if a property tax
credit is issued under this section, the credit or a voucher for a credit may be used only in
the taxable year in which it was issued or the next succeeding taxable year. However, a
homeowner whose dwelling is sold for taxes may receive the credit until the final decree
under § 14–844 of this article is entered.
9–105.

HOUSE BILL 1427
(A–1) (1) A HOMEOWNER WITH A FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME THAT
IS GREATER THAN $300,000 IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH
PROCEDURES TO VERIFY THE INCOME OF HOMEOWNERS FOR PURPOSES OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING § 13–202 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE,
THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH ANY INFORMATION
REQUIRED TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2027, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2027.